Massachusetts, session 194th, H5091.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 18A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “custody”, in line 20, the following sentences:-
Said bureau shall utilize pediatric best practices and a standard of care as defined by MassHealth
and the Department of Public Health guidelines when providing medical services to youth to
promote the health and well-being of every child, which shall include, but not be limited to,
mental health services, physical health services, health promotion, and preventative health care.
It shall further be responsible for monitoring and enforcement of medical contracts to improve
medical care access and quality for children in the care and custody of the department.
of 1